Wyoming, session 2026, SF0041.
Be It Enacted by the Legislature of the State of Wyoming:
Section 1. W.S. 27-1-117 is created to read:
27-1-117. Portable benefit accounts.
(a) As used in this section:
(i) "Financial institution" means any bank,
savings and loan association or credit union chartered
under the laws of Wyoming, the laws of the United States or
the laws of another territory or state of the United States
that is insured by the federal deposit insurance
corporation or the national credit union administration.
"Financial institution" shall include any special purpose
depository institution as defined by W.S. 13-1-101(a)(xvi);
(ii) "Hiring party" means a person that hires or
enters into a contract with an independent contractor;
(iii) "Independent contractor" means as defined
by W.S. 27-14-102(a)(xxiii);
(iv) "Portable benefit account" means an account
opened by an independent contractor that is:
(A) Administered by a portable benefit
account provider; and
1

ORIGINAL SENATE ENGROSSED
FILE NO. SF0041
ENROLLED ACT NO. 30, SENATE
SIXTY-EIGHTH LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WYOMING
2026 BUDGET SESSION
(B) Assigned to a beneficiary of one (1) or
more benefit plans for the purpose of funding the purchase
of one (1) or more benefit plans, including but not limited
to plans that provide health benefits, income replacement
insurance, vision and dental insurance, life insurance or
retirement benefits.
(v) "Portable benefit account provider" means
the administrator of a portable benefit account and shall
include:
(A) A financial institution;
(B) An investment management firm;
(C) A technology provider or program
manager that offers services through a financial
institution or investment management firm;
(D) Any other person that demonstrates to
the satisfaction of the state banking commissioner that the
manner in which the person will administer the portable
benefit account is consistent with the requirements of this
section.
(b) Any person, including but not limited to an
independent contractor, internet-based company and
application-based company, may voluntarily contribute funds
to a portable benefit account for or on behalf of an
independent contractor.
(c) Any contribution to a portable benefit account
made under this section shall not be used as a criterion or
factor for determining a person's employment
2

ORIGINAL SENATE ENGROSSED
FILE NO. SF0041
ENROLLED ACT NO. 30, SENATE
SIXTY-EIGHTH LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WYOMING
2026 BUDGET SESSION
classification, including a classification or determination
under W.S. 27-3-104 or 27-14-102(a)(xxiii).
(d) A contribution to a portable benefit account
under this section may be made using the funds of the
hiring party or as a percentage of funds withheld from
compensation owed to an independent contractor if all of
the following are met:
(i) The withholding of compensation, if
applicable, is expressly agreed to by the independent
contractor in writing;
(ii) The written agreement for withholding funds
or contributing employer funds is clear, unambiguous and
prominently displayed in a work contract or separate
agreement;
(iii) The withholdings are made only after an
independent contractor opts in to the withholdings;
(iv) The independent contractor is authorized to
opt out of the agreement at any time;
(v) A hiring party is authorized to opt out of
the agreement with at least sixty (60) days of notice to
the independent contractor.
Section 2. The department of workforce services shall
promulgate all rules necessary to implement this act.
3

ORIGINAL SENATE ENGROSSED
FILE NO. SF0041
ENROLLED ACT NO. 30, SENATE
SIXTY-EIGHTH LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WYOMING
2026 BUDGET SESSION
Section 3.
(a) Except as provided in subsection (b) of this
section, this act is effective immediately upon completion
of all acts necessary for a bill to become law as provided
by Article 4, Section 8 of the Wyoming Constitution.
(b) Section 1 of this act is effective July 1, 2026.
(END)
Speaker of the House President of the Senate
Governor
TIME APPROVED: _________
DATE APPROVED: _________
I hereby certify that this act originated in the Senate.
Chief Clerk
4